Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1132.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [144E.38] AMBULANCE SERVICE TRAINING AND STAFFING GRANT PROGRAM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, "employee" has the meaning given in section 181.960, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Grant program. new text end new text begin The director must establish and administer a program to award grants to eligible ambulance services for certain costs to train ambulance service employees as emergency medical technicians and staff the ambulance service. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Eligible ambulance services. new text end new text begin To be eligible for a grant under this section, an ambulance service must: new text end new text begin (1) be licensed under this chapter; and new text end new text begin (2) in the calendar year prior to the year in which the ambulance service first applies for a grant under this section, have had at least 50 percent of its staffing provided by emergency medical technicians. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Application. new text end new text begin An eligible ambulance service seeking a grant under this section must apply to the director in a form and manner and according to a timeline specified by the director. In its application, the eligible ambulance service must specify the number of individuals it plans to hire using the grant money, the number of employee training hours it plans to fund using the grant money, and other information required by the director. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Allowable uses of grant money; maximum grant amount. new text end new text begin (a) An ambulance service must use grant money awarded under this section only for one or more of the following: new text end new text begin (1) tuition for employees attending an emergency medical technician (EMT) education program approved by the director; new text end new text begin (2) employee examination fees for EMT certification; new text end new text begin (3) fees for background studies for new EMT employees; and new text end new text begin (4) incurred wage and benefit costs of employees while attending an EMT education program or program-related activities. Wage and benefit costs under this clause must be commensurate with the wages and benefits the ambulance service provides to an entry-level EMT and must not exceed $26 per hour. new text end new text begin (b) The grant amount awarded to an ambulance service must not exceed the amount needed for the costs in paragraph (a). new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Grant program oversight. new text end new text begin An ambulance service receiving a grant under this section must provide the director with information necessary for the director to administer and evaluate the grant program. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; AMBULANCE SERVICE TRAINING AND STAFFING GRANT PROGRAM.new text end new text begin $750,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $750,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the Office of Emergency Medical Services for the ambulance service training and staffing grant program under Minnesota Statutes, section 144E.38. new text end